Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 6. Nominations for Presidential Elections.

§ 24.2-542.
State Board to be furnished names of electors selected by political parties; oaths of electors.

In elections for President and Vice President of the United States, the appropriate chairman or secretary of each political party shall furnish to the State Board by noon of the seventy-fourth day before the presidential election (i) the names of the electors selected by the party at its convention held for that purpose, together with the names of the political party and of the candidates for President and Vice President for whom the electors are required to vote in the Electoral College and (ii) a copy of a subscribed and notarized oath by each elector stating that he will, if elected, cast his ballot for the candidates for President and Vice President nominated by the party that selected the elector, or as the party may direct in the event of death, withdrawal or disqualification of the party nominee. In the event of the death or withdrawal of a candidate of a political party for President or Vice President, that party may substitute the name of a different candidate before the State Board certifies to the county and city electoral boards the form of the official ballots. The State Board shall also be furnished, if it requests, with satisfactory evidence that any person undertaking to act as an elector on behalf of any political party is, in fact, duly and properly authorized to do so.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-290.1; 1950, p. 246; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-158; 1982, c. 650; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 574; 2001, c. 630.

Cross references.

As to certification by the state political party chairman of a political party whose national convention has been scheduled to be held after the seventy-fourth day before the presidential election, see §

24.2-542.1

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 630 inserted the clause (i) designator, substituted “required to vote” for “expected to vote,” and inserted “and (ii) a copy of a subscribed and notarized oath by each elector stating that he will, if elected, cast his ballot for the candidates for President and Vice President nominated by the party that selected the elector, or as the party may direct in the event of death, withdrawal or disqualification of the party nominee.”

§ 24.2-542.1.
State Board to be furnished names of electors selected by political parties; certain national conventions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-542

, (i) the state political party chairman of a political party whose national convention has been scheduled to be held after the seventy-fourth day before the presidential election, shall file by noon on the seventy-fourth day before the presidential election, with the certification of its at-large electors, a certification of the persons expected to be nominated for President and Vice President at its national convention; (ii) the State Board of Elections shall certify candidates to the local electoral boards and ballot preparation shall proceed based on the state party chairman’s certifications; and (iii) the persons nominated by the party at its national convention shall be certified to the State Board no later than 5:00 p.m. on the sixtieth day before the presidential election.

History.

2003, c. 808.

§ 24.2-543.
How other groups may submit names of electors; oaths of electors.

A group of qualified voters, not constituting a political party as defined in §

24.2-101

, may have the names of electors selected by them, including one elector residing in each congressional district and two from the Commonwealth at large, printed upon the official ballot to be used in the election of electors for President and Vice President by filing a petition pursuant to this section. The petition shall be filed with the State Board by noon of the seventy-fourth day before the presidential election. The petition shall be signed by at least 5,000 qualified voters and include signatures of at least 200 qualified voters from each congressional district. The petition shall be signed by petitioners on and after January 1 of the year of the presidential election only and contain the residence address of each petitioner. The signature of each petitioner shall be witnessed either by a person who is a constitutionally qualified candidate for President of the United States, who may witness his own petition, or by a person who is not a minor or a felon whose voting rights have not been restored and whose affidavit to that effect appears on each page of the petition. Each such person circulating a petition who is not a legal resident of the Commonwealth shall sign a statement on the affidavit that he consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of Virginia in resolving any disputes concerning the circulation of petitions, or signatures contained therein, by that person. The signatures of qualified voters collected by a nonresident petition circulator who fails to sign such statement, or who later fails to appear or produce documents when properly served with a subpoena to do so, shall not be counted towards the minimum number of signatures required pursuant to this subsection.The petition shall state the names of the electors selected by the petitioners, the party name under which they desire the named electors to be listed on the ballot, and the names of the candidates for President and Vice President for whom the electors are required to vote in the Electoral College. The persons filing the petition shall file with it a copy of a subscribed and notarized oath by each elector stating that he will, if elected, cast his ballot for the candidates for President and Vice President named in the petition, or as the party may direct in the event of death, withdrawal or disqualification of the party nominee. In order to utilize a selected party name on the ballot, the petitioners shall have had a state central committee composed of registered voters from each congressional district of the Commonwealth, a party plan and bylaws, and a duly designated chairman and secretary in existence and holding office for at least six months prior to filing the petition. The State Board may require proof that the petitioners meet these requirements before permitting use of a party name on the ballot. The party name shall not be identical with or substantially similar to the name of any political party qualifying under §

24.2-101

and then in existence.In the event of the death or withdrawal of a candidate for President or Vice President qualified to appear on the ballot by party name, that party may substitute the name of a different candidate before the State Board certifies to the county and city electoral boards the form of the official ballots.In the event that a group of qualified voters meets the requirements set forth in this section except that they cannot utilize a party name, the electors selected and the candidates for President and Vice President shall be identified and designated as “Independent” on the ballot. Substitution of a different candidate for Vice President may be made by the candidate for President before the State Board certifies to the county and city electoral boards the form of the official ballot.In the event of the death or disqualification of any person listed as an elector for candidates for President and Vice President on a petition filed pursuant to this section, the party or candidate for President, as applicable, may substitute the name of a different elector. Such substitution shall not invalidate any petition of qualified voters circulated with the name of the deceased or disqualified elector provided that notice of the substitution is filed with the State Board by noon of the seventy-fourth day before the presidential election. Notice of the substitution and the name of any substitute elector shall be submitted on a form prepared by the State Board.

If the State Board determines that a candidate for President does not qualify to have his name appear on the ballot pursuant to this section by reason of the candidate’s filed petition not containing the minimum number of signatures of qualified voters for the office sought, the candidate may appeal the determination to the State Board within seven calendar days of the issuance of the notice of disqualification. The notice of disqualification shall be sent by email or regular mail to the address on file for the candidate, and such notice shall be deemed sufficient. The State Board shall hear the appeal within three business days of its filing.The State Board shall develop procedures for the conduct of such an appeal. The consideration on appeal shall be limited to whether or not the signatures on the petitions that were filed were reasonably rejected according to the requirements of this title and the rules and procedures set forth by the State Board for checking petitions. Immediately after the conclusion of the appeal hearing, the State Board shall notify the candidate of its decision in writing. The decision on appeal shall be final and not subject to further appeal.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-290.3; 1952, c. 330; 1964, c. 542; 1968, c. 284; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-159; 1982, c. 650; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641; 1994, c. 149; 1998, cc. 152, 246; 2000, cc. 232, 252; 2001, c. 630; 2003, c. 477; 2012, cc. 166, 538; 2013, cc. 521, 550, 684; 2020, c. 501.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 232 and 252 are identical, and in the fifth sentence of the first paragraph, inserted “person who is a” preceding “qualified voter,” and inserted “or qualified to register to vote, and” thereafter.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 630, in the first paragraph, substituted “required to vote” for “expected to vote” in the sixth sentence, and added the seventh sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 477 deleted “and who is a resident of the same or a contiguous congressional district as the voter whose signature is witnessed” preceding “and whose” in the fifth sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by c. 166, effective March 7, 2012, and c. 538, effective April 4, 2012, are identical and substituted “witnessed either by a person who is a qualified voter, or qualified to register to vote, constitutionally qualified candidate for President of the United States, who may witness his own petition, or by a person who is a resident of the Commonwealth and who is not a minor or a felon whose voting rights have not been restored and whose affidavit” for “witnessed by a person who is a qualified voter, or qualified to register to vote, and whose affidavit” in the fifth sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 521, in the first paragraph, substituted “5,000” for “10,000,” and “200” for “400” in the third sentence.

The 2013 amendment by c. 550 in the first paragraph substituted “5,000” for “10,000,” and “200” for “400” in the third sentence, and added the last paragraph.

The 2013 amendment by c. 684 inserted the subsection A designation; and added subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 501, in subsection A, deleted “who is a resident of the Commonwealth and” following “or by a person” in the fifth sentence and added the last two sentences of the first paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 45.